el: Αριθμός ακίδων XLR: 10-pin; 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; 7-pin; 8-pin; Άλλο
pt-PT: Contagem de pinos XLR: 10 pinos; 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; 7 pinos; 8 pinos; Outro
sv: XLR-stiftantal: 10-polig; 2-polig; 3-polig; 4-polig; 5-polig; 6-polig; 7-polig; 8-polig; Övrigt
nl: Aantal XLR-pinnen: 10-pins; 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; 5-pins; 6-pins; 7-pins; 8-pins; Andere
sk-SK: Počet kolíkov XLR: 10-pinový; 2-pinový; 3-pinový; 4-pinový; 5-pinový; 6-pinový; 7-pinový; 8-pinový; Iné
ja: XLRピン数: 10ピン; 2ピン; 3ピン; 4ピン; 5ピン; 6ピン; 7ピン; 8ピン; その他
es: Cantidad de pines XLR: 10 pines; 2 pines; 3 pines; 4 pines; 5 pines; 6 pines; 7 pines; 8 pines; Otros
tr: XLR pin sayısı: 10 pin; 2 pin; 3 pin; 4 pin; 5 pin; 6 pin; 7 pin; 8 pin; Diğer
en: XLR pin count: 10-pin; 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; 7-pin; 8-pin; Other
hr-HR: Broj pinova XLR-a: 10-pinski; 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; 5-pinski; 6-pinski; 7-pinski; 8-pinski; Ostalo
ko: XLR 핀 수: 10핀; 2핀; 3핀; 4핀; 5핀; 6핀; 7핀; 8핀; 기타
bg-BG: Брой пинове на XLR: 10-пинов; 2-пинов; 3-пинов; 4-пинов; 5-пинов; 6-пинов; 7-пинов; 8-пинов; Други
vi: Số chân cắm XLR: 10 chân; 2 chân; 3 chân; 4 chân; 5 chân; 6 chân; 7 chân; 8 chân; Khác
fr: Nombre de broches du câble XLR: 10 broches; 2 broches; 3 broches; 4 broches; 5 broches; 6 broches; 7 broches; 8 broches; Autre
it: Conteggio pin XLR: 10 pin; 2 pin; 3 pin; 4 pin; 5 pin; 6 pin; 7 pin; 8 pin; Altro
nb: XLR-pinneantall: 10-pinners; 2-pinners; 3-pinners; 4-pinners; 5-pinners; 6-pinners; 7-pinners; 8-pinners; Annet
de: XLR-Pin-Anzahl: 10-polig; 2-polig; 3-polig; 4-polig; 5-polig; 6-polig; 7-polig; 8-polig; Sonstiges
da: XLR-pinantal: 10-polet; 2-polet; 3-polet; 4-polet; 5-polet; 6-polet; 7-polet; 8-polet; Andet
ru: Количество контактов XLR: 10-контактный; 2-контактный; 3-контактный; 4-контактный; 5-контактный; 6-контактный; 7-контактный; 8-контактный; Другой
pt-BR: Contagem de pinos XLR: 10 pinos; 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; 7 pinos; 8 pinos; Outro
pl: Liczba pinów XLR: 10-pinowy; 2-pinowy; 3-pinowy; 4-pinowy; 5-pinowy; 6-pinowy; 7-pinowy; 8-pinowy; Inne
sl-SI: Število pinov XLR: 10-pinska; 2-pinska; 3-pinska; 4-pinska; 5-pinska; 6-pinska; 7-pinska; 8-pinska; Drugo
fi: XLR-napaluku: 10-nastainen; 2-nastainen; 3-nastainen; 4-nastainen; 5-nastainen; 6-nastainen; 7-nastainen; 8-nastainen; Muu
zh-TW: XLR 接腳數: 10針; 2針; 3針; 4針; 5針; 6針; 7針; 8針; 其他
zh-CN: XLR 针脚数: 10 针; 2 针; 3 针; 4 针; 5 针; 6 针; 7 针; 8 针; 其他
ro-RO: Număr de pini XLR: 10 pini; 2 pini; 3 pini; 4 pini; 5 pini; 6 pini; 7 pini; 8 pini; Altele
cs: Počet pinů XLR: 10pinový; 2pinový; 3pinový; 4pinový; 5pinový; 6pinový; 7pinový; 8pinový; Jiné
lt-LT: XLR kištukų skaičius: 10 kontaktų; 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; 4 kontaktų; 5 kontaktų; 6 kontaktų; 7 kontaktų; 8 kontaktų; Kita
th: จำนวนพิน XLR: 10 ขา; 2 ขา; 3 ขา; 4 ขา; 5 ขา; 6 ขา; 7 ขา; 8 ขา; อื่นๆ
hu: XLR-tűszám: 10 tűs; 2 tűs; 3 tűs; 4 tűs; 5 tűs; 6 tűs; 7 tűs; 8 tűs; Egyéb